Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
CHAPTER 9
PREVENTION AND CONTROL OF AIR POLLUTION

Article 1

Air Quality.

Article 2

Motor Vehicle Emission Inspection and Maintenance.

Article 3

Gasoline Additives.

Cross references.

- Control of motor vehicle emissions,

§

40-8-130

et seq.

Editor's notes.

- By resolution (Ga. L. 1990, p. 661), the General Assembly provided that the Department of Natural Resources should not promulgate any rules or regulations requiring the installation of Stage II controls by gasoline service stations until such time as mandated by the United States Congress or the Environmental Protection Agency.

Ga. L. 1992, p. 918,

§

2, effective July 1, 1992, repealed and reenacted this chapter. The former provisions of this chapter have been designated as Article 1 thereof and an Article 2, pertaining to motor vehicle emissions, has been added.
References in Article 1 to "chapter" were changed to "article" by Ga. L. 1992, p. 918,

§

2.
Article 1 also reflects amendments made by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2886.

Ga. L. 1992, p. 2886,

§

2, provides for severability of the Act.

Law reviews.

-
For article, "Georgia's Environmental Law: A Survey," see 23 Mercer L. Rev. 633 (1972). For article surveying Georgia cases dealing with environment, natural resources, and land use from June 1977 through May 1978, see 30 Mercer L. Rev. 75 (1978). For article surveying provisions of Air Quality Act of 1978, see 14 Ga. St. B.J. 175 (1978). For article surveying recent legislative and judicial developments in zoning, planning and environmental law, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 89 (1979).
For note on 1992 amendment of this chapter, see 9 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 179 (1992).